Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-134
University of Nebraska Medical Center Medical Education Revolving Fund; established; use; investment.

The University of Nebraska Medical Center Medical Education Revolving Fund is hereby established to be administered by the Department of Health and Human Services. The fund shall be used to fund medical education. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 137;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 811.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.